New Jersey, session 221, A2346.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 28 of Title 19 to the contrary, when the results of any election, other than primary election ties resolved pursuant to R.S.19:13-20 and school election ties resolved pursuant to N.J.S.18A:12-15, produce a tie between two or more candidates for elective office, an automatic machine recount of the votes cast at the election in any district or districts shall occur within 48 hours following the initial results of that election. If the results of the automatic machine recount produce a tie between two or more candidates for elective office, an automatic hand recount of the votes cast at the election in any district or districts shall occur within 48 hours following the initial results of the automatic machine recount. If the results of the automatic hand recount produce a tie between two or more candidates for elective office and the board of elections or boards of elections have certified the results of the election, a special election shall be held within 60 days of the original election.  The special election shall be restricted to those candidates who remain tied following the automatic hand recount and shall be conducted in accordance with procedures for elections set forth in Title 19 of the Revised Statutes. The appropriate board of elections or boards of elections shall conduct any automatic recount or special election required pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.  The State shall reimburse the costs incurred for conducting any automatic recount or special election required pursuant to this subsection. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.